Missouri, session 2026, HB2857.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the state of Missouri, as follows:
Section A. Section 171.021, RSMo, is repealed and one new section enacted in lieu
thereof, to be known as section 171.021, to read as follows:
171.021. 1. Every school in this state which is supported in whole or in part by public
moneys, during the hours while school is in session, shall display in some prominent place
either upon the outside of the school building or upon a pole erected in the school yard the
flag of the United States of America.
2. Every school in this state which is supported in whole or in part by public moneys
shall ensure that the Pledge of Allegiance to the flag of the United States of America is recited
in at least one scheduled class of every pupil enrolled in that school no less often than once
per school day. Flags for display in individual classrooms may be provided by voluntary
donation by any person. No student shall be required to recite the Pledge of Allegiance.
3. (1) A public school shall display all of the following documents in such public
school:
(a) The Constitution of the United States;
(b) The Bill of Rights of the United States; and
(c) The Declaration of Independence of the United States.
EXPLANATION — Matter enclosed in bold-faced brackets [thus] in the above bill is not enacted and is
intended to be omitted from the law. Matter in bold-face type in the above bill is proposed language.

HB 2857 2
(2) Each document listed under subdivision (1) of this subsection shall be printed
and framed in its original size, format, and verbiage. Each document shall be displayed
in a prominent location that is freely accessible to all students in each public school.
✔